Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Broker-Dealers, Agents, Investment Advisers, Investment Adviser Representatives, and Federal Covered Investment Advisers.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Sec. 45.56.300.
Broker-dealer registration requirement and exemptions.

A person may not transact business in this state as a broker-dealer unless the person is registered under this chapter as a broker-dealer or is exempt from registration as a broker-dealer under (b) of this section.

The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement of (a) of this section:

a broker-dealer without a place of business in this state if the broker-dealer’s only transactions effected in this state are with

the issuer of the securities involved in the transactions;

a broker-dealer registered as a broker-dealer under this chapter or not required to be registered as a broker-dealer under this chapter;

an institutional investor;

a nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of $100,000,000 acting for the account of others under discretionary authority in a signed record;

a bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is not in this state if the person is registered as a broker-dealer under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or not required to be registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the customer maintains a principal place of residence;

a bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is in this state but who was not present in this state when the customer relationship was established if

the broker-dealer is registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or not required to be registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the customer relationship was established and where the customer had maintained a principal place of residence; and

within 45 days after the customer’s first transaction in this state, the person files an application for registration as a broker-dealer in this state and a further transaction is not effected more than 75 days after the date on which the application is filed, or, if earlier, the date on which the administrator notifies the person that the administrator has denied the application for registration or has stayed the pendency of the application for good cause;

not more than three customers in this state during the previous 12 months, in addition to those customers specified in (A) — (F) of this paragraph and under (H) of this paragraph if the broker-dealer is registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or not required to be registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the broker-dealer has its principal place of business; and

any other person exempted by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter; and

a person that deals solely in United States government securities and is supervised as a dealer in government securities by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the United States Comptroller of the Currency, or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

A broker-dealer or an issuer engaged in offering, offering to purchase, purchasing, or selling securities in this state may not, directly or indirectly, employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to securities transactions in this state if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with a broker-dealer, an issuer, an investment adviser, or a federal covered investment adviser by an order of the administrator under this chapter, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization. A broker-dealer or issuer does not violate this subsection if the broker-dealer or issuer did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the suspension, revocation, or bar. Upon request from a broker-dealer or issuer and for good cause, an order under this chapter may modify or waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection to the broker-dealer.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.405; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.310.
Limited registration of Canadian broker-dealers and agents.

If a broker-dealer is registered under this section and its principal office is located in a province or territory of Canada that provides at least equivalent registration for a broker-dealer that is resident in the United States, a broker-dealer that is resident in Canada and does not have an office or other physical presence in this state may effect transactions in securities with or for or induce or attempt to induce the purchase or sale of a security by a person from Canada who is

temporarily resident in this state and with whom the Canadian broker-dealer had a bona fide broker-dealer-client relationship before the person entered the United States; or

resident in this state and whose transactions are in a self-directed tax-advantaged retirement plan in Canada if the person is the holder of or contributor to the plan.

An agent who represents a Canadian broker-dealer registered under this section may, if the agent is registered under this section, effect transactions in securities in this state as permitted for the broker-dealer under (a) of this section.

Subject to the requirements of (a) of this section, a Canadian broker-dealer may register under this section if the broker-dealer

files an application in the form required by the jurisdiction in which the broker-dealer has its principal office;

files a written consent to service of process under AS

45.56.650

;

is registered as a broker or dealer in good standing in the jurisdiction from which the broker-dealer is effecting transactions into this state and files evidence of the registration; and

is a member of a self-regulating organization or stock exchange in Canada.

An agent may register under this section to effect transactions in securities in this state if the agent represents a Canadian broker-dealer that is registered under this section, and the agent

files an application in the form required by the jurisdiction in which the broker-dealer has its principal office;

files a written consent to service of process under AS

45.56.650

; and

is registered and files evidence of good standing in the jurisdiction from which the agent is effecting transactions into this state.

Registration under this section becomes effective on the 30th day after an application is filed unless it is made effective earlier by the administrator or a denial order is in effect and a proceeding is pending under AS

45.56.440

.

A Canadian broker-dealer registered under this section shall

maintain provincial or territorial registration and membership in good standing in a self-regulating organization or stock exchange;

provide the administrator on request with books and records relating to its business in this state as a broker-dealer;

inform the administrator promptly of any criminal action taken against the broker-dealer or of any finding or sanction imposed on the broker-dealer as a result of regulatory action, including that of a self-regulating organization, involving fraud, theft, deceit, misrepresentation, or similar conduct; and

disclose to its clients in this state that the broker-dealer and its agents are not subject to the full regulatory requirements of this chapter.

An agent of a Canadian broker-dealer registered under this section shall

maintain provincial or territorial registration in good standing; and

inform the administrator promptly of any criminal action taken against the agent or of any finding or sanction imposed on the broker-dealer or agent as a result of regulatory action, including that of a self-regulating organization, involving fraud, theft, deceit, misrepresentation, or similar conduct.

A Canadian broker-dealer or agent registered under this section may renew its registration by filing by midnight on December 31 of each year the most recent renewal application, if any, filed in the jurisdiction in which the broker-dealer or agent has its principal office or, if a renewal application is not required, the most recent application filed under (c)(1) or (d)(1) of this section.

An applicant for registration or renewal registration under this section shall pay the fee for broker-dealers and agents required by this chapter.

A Canadian broker-dealer or agent registered under this section may not effect transactions in this state except

as permitted under (a) or (b) of this section;

with or through

the issuers of the securities involved in the transactions;

other broker-dealers; or

banks, savings institutions, trust companies, insurance companies, investment companies as defined in 15 U.S.C. 80a-3 (Investment Company Act of 1940), pension or profit-sharing trusts, or other financial institutions or institutional buyers, whether acting for themselves or as trustees; or

as otherwise permitted by this chapter.

A Canadian broker-dealer or agent registered under this section and acting in accordance with the limitations in (j) of this section is exempt from all of the requirements of this chapter except the anti-fraud provisions under AS

45.56.500

and the requirements of this section. The registration of a Canadian broker-dealer or agent under this section may not be denied, suspended, or revoked except in accordance with the provisions of AS

45.56.440

for a breach of the anti-fraud provisions under AS

45.56.500

or the requirements of this section.

In this section, “Canadian broker-dealer” means a broker-dealer that has its principal office in a province or territory of Canada.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.410

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.320.
Registration exemption for merger and acquisition broker.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, a merger and acquisition broker is exempt from registration under AS

45.56.300

.

A merger and acquisition broker is not exempt from registration under AS

45.56.300

if the broker

directly or indirectly, in connection with the transfer of ownership of an eligible privately held company, receives, holds, transmits, or has custody of the funds or securities to be exchanged by the parties to the transaction;

engages on behalf of an issuer in a public offering of any class of securities that is registered, or is required to be registered, with the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 78l(b) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or with respect to which the issuer files, or is required to file, periodic information, documents, and reports under 15 U.S.C. 78o(d) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934); or

engages on behalf of any party in a transaction involving a public shell company.

A merger and acquisition broker is not exempt from registration under AS

45.56.300

if the broker is subject to

suspension or revocation of registration under 15 U.S.C. 78o(b)(4) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

a statutory disqualification described in 15 U.S.C. 78c(a)(39) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

a disqualification established by the rules adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission under Public Law 112-106, sec. 302(d), for 15 U.S.C. 77d (Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act); or

a final order described in 15 U.S.C. 78o(b)(4)(H) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934).

This section may not be construed to limit any other authority of the department to exempt any person, or any class of persons, from a provision of this chapter, or a provision of a rule or regulation adopted under this chapter.

In this section,

“control” means the power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management or policies of a company, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise; there is a presumption of control for any person who

is a director, general partner, limited liability company member, limited liability company manager, an officer who exercises executive responsibility, or an officer who has status or functions similar to an officer who exercises executive responsibility;

has the right to vote 20 percent or more of a class of voting securities or the power to sell or direct the sale of 20 percent or more of a class of voting securities; or

in the case of a partnership or limited liability company, has the right to receive upon dissolution, or has contributed, 20 percent or more of the capital;

“eligible privately held company” means a company that

does not have any class of securities registered, or required to be registered, with the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 78l(b) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), or with respect to which the company files, or is required to file, periodic information, documents, and reports under 15 U.S.C. 78o(d) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934); and

in the fiscal year ending immediately before the fiscal year in which the services of the merger and acquisition broker are initially engaged with respect to the securities transaction, meets either or both of the following conditions, determined in accordance with the historical financial accounting records of the company:

the earnings of the company before interest, taxes, depreciation, and amortization are less than $25,000,000;

the gross revenue of the company is less than $250,000,000;

“merger and acquisition broker” means a broker, and a person associated with the broker, engaged in the business of effecting securities transactions solely in connection with the transfer of ownership of an eligible privately held company, regardless of whether that broker acts on behalf of a seller or buyer, through the purchase, sale, exchange, issuance, repurchase, or redemption of, or a business combination involving, securities or assets of the eligible privately held company, if the broker reasonably believes that

upon consummation of the transaction, a person acquiring securities or assets of the eligible privately held company, acting alone or in concert, will control and, directly or indirectly, be active in the management of the eligible privately held company or the business conducted with the assets of the eligible privately held company; and

if a person is offered securities in exchange for securities or assets of the eligible privately held company, the person will, before becoming legally bound to consummate the transaction, receive or have reasonable access to the most recent fiscal year-end financial statements of the issuer of the securities as customarily prepared by its management in the normal course of operations and, if the financial statements of the issuer are audited, reviewed, or compiled, any related statement by the independent accountant; a balance sheet dated not more than 120 days before the date of the exchange offer; and information pertaining to the management, business, results of operations for the period covered by the foregoing financial statements, and any material loss contingencies of the issuer;

“public shell company” means a company that, at the time of a transaction with an eligible privately held company,

has any class of securities registered, or required to be registered, with the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 78l(b), or with respect to which the company files, or is required to file, periodic information, documents, and reports under 15 U.S.C. 78o(d);

has no assets or has nominal operations; and

has

no assets or has nominal assets;

assets consisting solely of cash and cash equivalents; or

assets consisting of any amount of cash and cash equivalents and nominal other assets.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.420

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.330.
Agent registration requirement and exemptions.

An individual may not transact business in this state as an agent unless the individual is registered under this chapter as an agent or is exempt from registration as an agent under (b) of this section.

The following individuals are exempt from the registration requirement of (a) of this section:

an individual who represents a broker-dealer in effecting transactions in this state limited to those described in 15 U.S.C. 78o(i);

an individual who represents a broker-dealer that is exempt under AS

45.56.300(b)

or

45.56.310

;

an individual who represents an issuer with respect to an offer or sale of the issuer’s own securities or those of the issuer’s parent or any of the issuer’s subsidiaries and who is not compensated in connection with the individual’s participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities;

an individual who represents an issuer and who effects transactions in the issuer’s securities exempted by AS

45.56.120

, other than AS

45.56.120

(11) and (14);

an individual who represents an issuer that effects transactions solely in federal covered securities of the issuer, but an individual who effects transactions in a federal covered security under 15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(3) or (b)(4)(D) (Securities Act of 1933) is not exempt if the individual is compensated in connection with the agent’s participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities;

an individual who represents a broker-dealer registered in this state under AS

45.56.300(a)

or exempt from registration under AS

45.56.300(b)

in the offer and sale of securities for an account of a nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of $100,000,000 acting for the account of others under discretionary authority in a signed record;

an individual who represents an issuer in connection with the purchase of the issuer’s own securities;

an individual who represents an issuer and who restricts participation to performing clerical or ministerial acts; or

any other individual exempted by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The registration of an agent is effective only while the agent is employed by or associated with a broker-dealer registered under this chapter or an issuer that is offering, selling, or purchasing the issuer’s securities in this state.

A broker-dealer or an issuer engaged in offering, selling, or purchasing securities in this state may not employ or associate with an agent who transacts business in this state on behalf of broker-dealers or issuers unless the agent is registered under (a) of this section or exempt from registration under (b) of this section.

An individual may not act as an agent for more than one broker-dealer or one issuer at a time, unless the broker-dealer or the issuer for which the agent acts is affiliated by direct or indirect common control or is authorized by a regulation or order issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.430

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.340.
Investment adviser registration requirement and exemptions.

A person may not transact business in this state as an investment adviser unless the person is registered under this chapter as an investment adviser or is exempt from registration as an investment adviser under (b) of this section.

The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement in (a) of this section:

a person without a place of business in this state that is registered under the securities act of the state in which the person has the person’s principal place of business if the person’s only clients in this state are

federal covered investment advisers, investment advisers registered under this chapter, or broker-dealers registered under this chapter;

institutional investors;

bona fide preexisting clients whose principal places of residence are not in this state if the investment adviser is registered under the securities act of the state in which the clients maintain principal places of residence; or

exempted by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

a person without a place of business in this state if the person has had, during the preceding 12 months, not more than five clients that are resident in this state in addition to those specified under (1) of this subsection; or

any other person exempted by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

An investment adviser may not, directly or indirectly, employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to investment advice in this state if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with an investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or broker-dealer by an order under this chapter, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization, unless the investment adviser did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the suspension, revocation, or bar. Upon request from the investment adviser and for good cause, the administrator may by order, waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection to the investment adviser.

An investment adviser may not employ or associate with an individual required to be registered under this chapter as an investment adviser representative who transacts business in this state on behalf of the investment adviser unless the individual is registered under AS

45.56.350(a)

or is exempt from registration under AS

45.56.350(b)

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.435; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.350.
Investment adviser representative registration requirement and exemptions.

An individual may not transact business in this state as an investment adviser representative unless the individual is registered under this chapter as an investment adviser representative or is exempt from registration as an investment adviser representative under (b) of this section.

The following individuals are exempt from the registration requirement of (a) of this section:

an individual who is employed by or associated with an investment adviser that is exempt from registration under AS

45.56.340(b)

or a federal covered investment adviser that is excluded from the notice filing requirements of AS

45.56.360

; and

any other individual exempted by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The registration of an investment adviser representative is not effective while the investment adviser representative is not employed by or associated with an investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered investment adviser that has made or is required to make a notice filing under AS

45.56.360

.

An individual may transact business as an investment adviser representative for more than one investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser unless a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter prohibits or limits an individual from acting as an investment adviser representative for more than one investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser.

An individual acting as an investment adviser representative may not, directly or indirectly, conduct business in this state on behalf of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser if the registration of the individual as an investment adviser representative is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser by an order under this chapter, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization. Upon request from a federal covered investment adviser and for good cause, the administrator may by order, waive, in whole or in part, the application of the requirements of this subsection to the federal covered investment adviser.

An investment adviser registered under this chapter, a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under AS

45.56.360

, or a broker-dealer registered under this chapter is not required to employ or associate with an individual as an investment adviser representative if the only compensation paid to the individual for a referral of investment advisory clients is paid to an investment adviser registered under this chapter, a federal covered investment adviser who has filed a notice under AS

45.56.360

, or a broker-dealer registered under this chapter with which the individual is employed or associated as an investment adviser representative.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.440

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.360.
Federal covered investment adviser notice filing requirement.

Except with respect to a federal covered investment adviser described in (b) of this section, a federal covered investment adviser may not transact business in this state as a federal covered investment adviser unless the federal covered investment adviser complies with (c) of this section.

The following federal covered investment advisers are not required to comply with (c) of this section:

a federal covered investment adviser without a place of business in this state if the only clients of the federal covered investment adviser in this state are

federal covered investment advisers, investment advisers registered under this chapter, and broker-dealers registered under this chapter;

institutional investors;

bona fide preexisting clients whose principal places of residence are not in this state; or

other clients specified by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

a federal covered investment adviser without a place of business in this state if the person has had, during the preceding 12 months, not more than five clients that are resident in this state in addition to those specified under (1) of this subsection; and

any other person excluded by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

A person acting as a federal covered investment adviser not excluded under (b) of this section shall file a notice, a consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

, and the records that have been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 80b-1 — 80b-21 (Investment Advisers Act of 1940) as required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter and shall pay the fees specified in AS

45.56.410

.

The notice under (c) of this section becomes effective upon filing.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.445; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.370.
Registration by broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment adviser representative.

A person shall register as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative by filing an application and a consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

and by paying the fee specified in AS

45.56.410

and any reasonable fees charged by the designee of the administrator for processing the filing. The application must contain

the information or record required for the filing of a uniform application; and

upon request by the administrator, any other financial or other information or record that the administrator determines is appropriate.

If the information or record contained in an application filed under (a) of this section is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

If an order is not in effect, and a proceeding is not pending under AS

45.56.440

, and the administrator has not initiated an investigation, registration becomes effective at noon on the 45th day after a completed application is filed, unless the registration is denied. A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may set an earlier effective date or may defer the effective date until noon on the 45th day after the filing of any amendment completing the application.

A registration is effective until midnight on December 31 of the year for which the application for registration is filed. Unless an order is in effect under AS

45.56.440

, a registration may be automatically renewed each year by filing the records required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, by paying the fee specified in AS

45.56.410

, and by paying costs charged by the designee of the administrator for processing the filings.

A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may impose other conditions, not inconsistent with 15 U.S.C. 77b, 77c, 77e, 77f, 77r, 77z-3, 77ddd, 78b — 78d, 78g, 78h, 78n, 78o, 78q, 78bb, 78ee, 78kk, 78mm, 80a-2, 80a-3, 80a-6, 80a-12, 80a-24, 80a-26, 80a-27, 80a-29, 80a-30, 80a-34, 80a-51, 80a-54, 80a-60, 80a-63, 80b-2, 80b-3a, 80b-5, 80b-10, 80b-18a, and 80b-20, and 29 U.S.C. 1002 (National Securities Markets Improvement Act of 1996). An order issued under this chapter may waive, in whole or in part, specific requirements in connection with registration that are in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.450; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.380.
Succession and change in registration of broker-dealer or investment adviser.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser may succeed to the current registration of another broker-dealer or investment adviser or a notice filing of a federal covered investment adviser, and a federal covered investment adviser may succeed to the current registration of an investment adviser or notice filing of another federal covered investment adviser, by filing as a successor an application for registration under AS

45.56.300

or

45.56.340

or a notice under AS

45.56.360

for the unexpired portion of the current registration or notice filing.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser that changes its form of organization or state of incorporation or organization may continue its registration by filing an amendment to its registration if the change does not involve a material change in its financial condition or management. The amendment becomes effective when filed or on a date designated by the registrant in its filing. The new organization is a successor to the original registrant for the purposes of this chapter. If there is a material change in financial condition or management, the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall file a new application for registration. A predecessor registered under this chapter shall stop conducting its securities business other than winding down transactions and shall file for withdrawal of broker-dealer or investment adviser registration within 45 days after filing its amendment to effect succession.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser that changes its name may continue its registration by filing an amendment to its registration. The amendment becomes effective when filed or on a date designated by the registrant.

A change of control of a broker-dealer or investment adviser may be made in accordance with a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.455; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.390.
Termination of employment or association of agent and investment adviser representative and transfer of employment or association.

If an agent registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with a broker-dealer or issuer, or if an investment adviser representative registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with an investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser, or if either registrant terminates activities that require registration as an agent or investment adviser representative, the broker-dealer, issuer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser shall promptly file a notice of termination. The registrant may file the notice of termination if the registrant learns that the broker-dealer, issuer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser has not filed the notice.

If an agent registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with a broker-dealer registered under this chapter and begins employment by or association with another broker-dealer registered under this chapter, or if an investment adviser representative registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with an investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under AS

45.56.360

and begins employment by or association with another investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under AS

45.56.360

, then, within 30 days after the termination, upon the filing by or on behalf of the registrant of an application for registration that complies with the requirement of AS

45.56.370(a)

and payment of the filing fee required under AS

45.56.410

, the registration of the agent or investment adviser representative is

immediately effective as of the date of the completed filing, if the agent’s record or successor record in the Central Registration Depository operated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or the investment adviser representative’s record or successor record in the Investment Adviser Registration Depository operated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority does not contain a new or amended disciplinary disclosure within the previous 12 months; or

temporarily effective as of the date of the completed filing, if the agent’s record or successor record in the Central Registration Depository operated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or the investment adviser representative’s record or successor record in the Investment Adviser Registration Depository operated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority contains a new or amended disciplinary disclosure within the preceding 12 months.

The administrator may withdraw a temporary registration if there are or were grounds for discipline as specified in AS

45.56.440

and the administrator does so within 30 days after the filing of the application. If the administrator does not withdraw the temporary registration within the 30-day period, registration becomes automatically effective on the 31st day after filing.

The administrator may prevent the effectiveness of a transfer of an agent or investment adviser representative under (b)(1) or (2) of this section based on the public interest and the protection of investors.

If the administrator determines that a registrant or applicant for registration is no longer in existence, has ceased to act as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, is the subject of an adjudication of incapacity, is subject to the control of a committee, conservator, or guardian, or cannot reasonably be located, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that the registration be cancelled or terminated or the application be denied. The administrator may reinstate a cancelled or terminated registration, with or without hearing, and may make the registration retroactive.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.460; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.400.
Withdrawal of registration of broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment adviser representative.

Withdrawal of registration by a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative becomes effective 60 days after the filing of the application to withdraw or within any shorter period as provided by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter unless a revocation or suspension proceeding is pending when the application is filed. If a proceeding is pending, withdrawal becomes effective when and upon the conditions required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter. The administrator may institute a revocation or suspension proceeding under AS

45.56.440

within one year after the withdrawal became effective automatically and issue a revocation or suspension order as of the last date on which registration was effective if a proceeding is not pending.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.465; renumbered in 2018, at which time a reference to another renumbered section was conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.410.
Fees.

The administrator shall establish fees by regulation for

an initial filing of an application as a broker-dealer and renewal of an application by a broker-dealer for registration;

an application for registration as an agent and renewal of registration as an agent;

an application for registration as an investment adviser and renewal of registration as an investment adviser;

an application for registration as an investment adviser representative, a renewal of registration as an investment adviser representative, and a change of registration as an investment adviser representative; and

an initial fee and annual notice fee for a federal covered investment adviser required to file a notice under AS

45.56.360

.

A person required to pay a filing or notice fee under this section may transmit the fee through or to a designee as provided by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The administrator may establish other fees by regulation as necessary to administer this chapter.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.470; renumbered in 2018, at which time a reference to another renumbered section was conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.